Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 11. Parks and Recreation Areas.

Sec. 38.05.295.
Parks and recreation areas.

The commissioner shall establish a policy and adopt regulations by which parks and recreation areas, including public scenic overlooks and cultural sites, shall be developed and managed in a manner that will best serve the interests of the people of the state. The commissioner may classify public land as parks, scenic overlooks, cultural sites, and recreation areas as long as the general intent of this chapter is maintained.

History.

(§ 1 art XII ch 169 SLA 1959)

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For land planning and classification, see 11 AAC 55.

Collateral references. —

59 Am. Jur. 2d, Parks, Squares, and Playgrounds, § 1 et seq.

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Lands, § 1 et seq.

73A C.J.S., Public Lands, § 1 et seq.